Tennessee, session 114, SB0859.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-11-611(c), is amended by
designating the current language as subdivision (c)(1) and adding the following as a new
subdivision (c)(2):
(2) A person using force intended or likely to cause death or serious bodily injury
from within the person's residence or dwelling is presumed to have acted in accordance
with subdivision (b)(2) when that force is used against an individual armed with a deadly
weapon who is unlawfully present on the person's property and outside of the enclosed
structure of the person's residence or dwelling.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-11-611(d), is amended by
deleting "subsection (c)" and substituting "subdivision (c)(1)".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0859
002513
- 1 -